Utah statutes.
59-14-103.   Waiver or reduction of penalty.

The commission may, upon making a record of its actions, and upon reasonable cause shown, waive, reduce, or compromise any of the penalties or interest imposed under:

(1)  Subsection 59-14-212(4)(b)(ii);

(2)  Subsection 59-14-214(5)(b)(ii);

(3)  Subsection 59-14-407(5)(b)(ii);

(4)  Subsection 59-14-606(7)(b)(ii); or

(5)  Subsection 59-14-608(1)(d).

